District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.04

Temporary visitation.

(a)

A court of the District which does not have jurisdiction to modify a child-custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

(1)

A visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

(2)

The visitation provisions of a child-custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

(b)

If a court of the District makes an order under subsection (a)(2) of this section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified in subchapter II of this chapter. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4603.08.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 304 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).